Utah statutes.
53C-1-203.   Board of trustees nominating committee -- Composition -- Responsibilities -- Per diem and expenses.

(1)  There is established an 11 member board of trustees nominating committee.

(2) (a)  The State Board of Education shall appoint five members to the nominating committee from different geographical areas of the state.

(b)  The governor shall appoint five members to the nominating committee on or before the December 1 of the year preceding the vacancy on the nominating committee as follows:

(i)  one individual from a nomination list of at least two names of individuals knowledgeable about institutional trust lands submitted on or before the October 1 of the year preceding the vacancy on the nominating committee by the University of Utah and Utah State University on an alternating basis every four years;

(ii)  one individual from a nomination list of at least two names submitted by the Utah Farm Bureau in consultation with the Utah Cattleman's Association and the Utah Wool Growers' Association on or before the October 1 of the year preceding the vacancy on the nominating committee;

(iii)  one individual from a nomination list of at least two names submitted by the Utah Petroleum Association on or before the October 1 of the year preceding the vacancy on the nominating committee;

(iv)  one individual from a nomination list of at least two names submitted by the Utah Mining Association on or before the October 1 of the year preceding the vacancy on the nominating committee; and

(v)  one individual from a nomination list of at least two names submitted by the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources after consultation with statewide wildlife and conservation organizations on or before the October 1 of the year preceding the vacancy on the nominating committee.

(c)  The president of the Utah Association of Counties shall designate the chair of the Public Lands Steering Committee, who must be an elected county commissioner or councilor, to serve as the eleventh member of the nominating committee.

(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), each member shall serve a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the state board and the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.

(c)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(4)  The nominating committee shall select a chair and vice chair from its membership by majority vote.

(5) (a)  The nominating committee shall nominate at least two candidates for each position or vacancy which occurs on the board of trustees except for the governor's appointee under Subsection 53C-1-202(5).

(b)  The nominations shall be by majority vote of the committee.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

